Mississippi, session 2026, HB1402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  A segment of U.S. Highway 49 North located in Yazoo County, Mississippi, and extending for a distance of approximately one (1) mile is designated and shall be known as the "Colonel Donnell Berry Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.